Utah statutes.
13-19-1.   Definition.

As used in this section, "shopping cart retrieval business" means the business of searching for, gathering, and restoring possession to the merchant or owner, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, of shopping carts located outside the premises of a retail mercantile establishment.



Enacted by Chapter 22, 1983 General Session

